Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5098.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 32e. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, the unemployment insurance agency shall not discontinue the use of its fraud detection software for any period of time, except as necessary to perform routine maintenance on the fraud detection software to ensure the fraud detection software functions properly. (2) Any routine maintenance performed under subsection (1) must be documented and limited in duration. At the time the maintenance is completed, the fraud detection software must be immediately restored for use. (3) As used in this section, "fraud detection software" means any program, database, or software the unemployment insurance agency uses to evaluate claims for potential fraud.